dict/builddict/names.dic
أجماد/ADACABAAJA
جواسق/ADACABAA
جواسيق/ADACABAA
حشرة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
خاتمة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJA
ختنة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
مرأى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAJALBLA
روائح/ADACABAA
زريع/ADACABAAJALBLA
مزرعة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJALBLA
أستار/ADACABAAJA
شقة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJALBLA
مشكة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
تشكيلة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
عدو/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJA
معاشر/ADACABAA
عشة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
عمية/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJA
مقصف/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJALBLA
قصيل/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJALBLA
قضية/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJA
لواحظ/ADACABAA
ليث/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJALBLA
ليوث/ADACABAAJA
ملاريا/ABAA
منجى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAJA
إ‏تباع/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
اتجاه/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
اتزان/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
استنجاد/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
استنزاف/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
اعوجاج/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
تقاول/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
تقايل/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
تقدم/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJANDNCNBNALCLBLA
تكثم/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
تمطط/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
تمطي/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAKAJA
توتر/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
تفجيع/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
تفحيم/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
تفريج/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
هرير/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
توسيخ/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
أوساخ/ADACABAAJA
سترة/ADACABAAJA
مؤدب/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
مضل/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
باهر/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJA
بائس/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
متاجر/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
متأمل/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
متحجر/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJA
متجهم/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
متعلم/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
مرمم/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
عارض/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
قائل/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
قائم/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
قاتن/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJA
قاحب/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJA
قاطع/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
قانع/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
لاحق/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
مستحضر/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJADEIE
مبتلى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAIDICIBIAJA
مرعبل/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJA
مرعي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
مركز/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJA
مرموز/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJA
مسرح/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
مسكوت/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJA
معمى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAJA
نتن/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJA
نجس/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
نقه/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
نكد/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
وهج/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJA
شكس/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
فردى/ADACABAAEDECEBEA
حرصى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAHDHCHBHA
وعيا/ADACABAAEDECEBEAHDHCHBHA
ضوقى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAHDHCHBHA
عظمى/ADACABAAEDECEBEAHDHCHBHA
برتغالي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
برتقالي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJA
بلدي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJA
بهلواني/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
حبشي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
حضري/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
صهاينة/ADACABAAJA
صيارفة/ADACABAAJA
نحرير/ADACABAACDCCCBCAJA
اشرئباب/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJA
سحاقة/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJA
تتميم/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJALBLA
شكوى/ADACABAAEDECEBEA
سدن/ADACABAAJA
صدغ/ADACABAAJA
همش/ADACABAAJA
تربل/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJA
تنزيع/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJA
قطور/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHAJA
ظارف/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
ظاعن/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
عارب/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
عارج/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
غازل/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
فارك/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
مستوعد/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
مستوفد/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
محذر/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
محفظ/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
مستقطع/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAIDICIBIAJA
ذام/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJA
عسير/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHAJAIFDEIE
تواكب/ADACABAACDCCCBCAHDHCHBHALBLAJA
إديولوجي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
فديرالي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
بنغالي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
يرموكي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
بيوغرافي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
قوطي/BDBCBBBADDDCDBDAHDHCHBHANDNCNBNAJA
كبداني/np	#اللغوي الأول
زروقي/np	# المطوّر
الزورق/mp	#والد واسم عائلة المطوّر
الخبوزية/mp	#بلدة المطوّر
